Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202513-3406
Unused property tax request authority; carry forward; unused restricted funds authority; conversion.

(1) A political subdivision may choose not to increase its total property taxes levied by the full amount of the property tax request authority allowed in a particular year. In such cases, the political subdivision may carry forward to future budget years the amount of unused property tax request authority, but accumulation of unused property tax request authority shall not exceed an aggregate of five percent of the total property tax request authority from the prior year.

(2) A political subdivision may choose to convert its accumulated amount of unused restricted funds authority existing on June 30, 2025, as determined in accordance with section 13-521, into unused property tax request authority. The amount converted may then be used by the political subdivision as unused property tax request authority for fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2025. The amount converted shall not exceed five percent of the total property taxes levied for the political subdivision in calendar year 2024.

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB34, § 6;

Laws 2025, LB647, § 16.